Montana, session 2025, HB507.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Article VIII, section 16, of The Constitution of the State of Montana is amended to read:
"Section 16. Limitation on sales tax or and use tax rates for education. The rate of legislature
shall dedicate the net revenue from a general statewide sales tax or and use tax may not exceed of 4% to
reduce property taxes that fund K-12 education unless appropriated for other purposes by a vote of three-
fourths of the members of each house of the legislature."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Two-thirds vote required. Because [section 1] is a legislative proposal
to amend the constitution, Article XIV, section 8, of the Montana constitution requires an affirmative roll call vote
of two-thirds of all the members of the legislature, whether one or more bodies, for passage.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. If approved by the electorate, [this act] is effective July 1,
2027.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Submission to electorate. [This act] shall be submitted to the qualified
electors of Montana at the general election to be held in November 2026 by printing on the ballot the full title of
[this act] and the following:
[] YES on Constitutional Amendment ____.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 507

2026
69th Legislature 2025 HB 507.1
[] NO on Constitutional Amendment ____.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 507